North Dakota statutes. TITLE 51 Sales and Exchanges
CHAPTER 51-19 Franchise Investment Law
51-19-12.
Civil liability.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule or order issued by the commissioner thereunder is liable to the franchisee or subfranchisor who may bring an action for damages, for rescission, or for such other relief as the court may deem appropriate.

Every person who directly or indirectly controls a person liable under subsection 1, every partner in a firm so liable, every principal executive officer or director of a corporation so liable, every president or governor of a limited liability company so liable, every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, and every employee of a person so liable who materially aids in the act or transaction constituting the violation is also liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as such person, unless the other person who is so liable had no knowledge of or reasonable grounds to believe in the existence of the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist.

In any action under this section, the franchisee or subfranchisor, if successful, is also entitled to costs and disbursements plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

No franchisee or subfranchisor may file or maintain an action under this section if the person received a written offer before the action was commenced and at a time when the person owned the franchise to refund the consideration paid together with interest at the rate of seven percent per annum from the date of purchase, less the amount of income received on the franchise, conditioned only upon tender by the franchisee or subfranchisor of all items received by the person for the consideration and not sold, and failed to accept the offer within thirty days of its receipt or if the franchisee received the offer before the action was commenced and at a time when the person did not own the franchise, unless the person rejected the offer in writing within thirty days of its receipt; provided, that in either instance the offering documents and rescission prospectus must be submitted to the commissioner for approval at least fifteen days prior to submission to the franchisee or subfranchisor. The rescission offer must recite the provisions of this section. If the franchise involves a substantial building or substantial equipment and a significant period of time has elapsed since the sale of the franchise, the commissioner, in approving a rescission offer, may approve an equitable offer recognizing depreciation, amortization, and other factors which bear upon the value of the franchise being returned to the franchisor.

No action may be brought under this section after five years from the date that the aggrieved party knew or reasonably should have known about the facts that are the basis for the alleged violation. This subsection does not apply to any action under sections 51-19-09 and 51-19-11.

Except as explicitly provided in this section, no civil liability in favor of any private party may arise against any person by implication from or as a result of the violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or order issued by the commissioner thereunder. Nothing herein limits any liability which may exist by virtue of any other statute or under common law if this chapter were not in effect.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 452, § 12; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 100, § 15.

51-19-13.
Powers of the commissioner — Civil penalty.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, the commissioner may bring an action in the name of the people of the state of North Dakota in the district court to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance with this chapter or any rule or order hereunder. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus must be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets. The court may not require the commissioner to post a bond.

The commissioner may make such public and private investigations within or outside of this state as the commissioner deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms hereunder and publish information concerning the violation of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder.

The commissioner may require or permit any person to file a statement under oath or otherwise subject to the penalties of perjury as the commissioner requires in writing as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated. Failure to reply with all required information to the commissioner’s letter within fifteen days after receipt thereof shall be the basis for issuance of a cease and desist order.

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the commissioner deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to, any person, the district court upon application by the commissioner may issue to the person an order requiring the person to appear before the commissioner or the officer designated by the commissioner there to produce documentary evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt.

No person is excused from attending and testifying or from producing any document or record before the commissioner or in obedience to the subpoena of the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner or in any proceeding instituted by the commissioner on the ground that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person may tend to incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture. No testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, compelled from an individual after a valid claim of the privilege against self-incrimination has been made may be used against the individual in any criminal proceeding, or in any proceeding to subject the individual to a penalty or forfeiture, except that the individual testifying is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury or contempt committed in testifying.

If, in the opinion of the commissioner, the offer of any franchise is subject to registration under this chapter and it is being or has been offered for sale without the offer first being registered, the commissioner may order the franchisor or offeror of the franchise to desist and refrain from the further offer or sale of the franchise unless and until the offer has been duly registered under this chapter. In addition to any other remedy authorized by this chapter, the commissioner may impose by order and collect a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation against any person found in an administrative action to have violated this chapter. The commissioner may bring an action in district court to recover penalties under this section. If, within fifteen days after the order has been served on the respondent, a request for a hearing is filed in writing by the person to whom the order was directed, a hearing must be held within fifteen business days after the request is made unless the persons affected consent to a later date. If a request for hearing is not made within the fifteen days permitted herein, the order is final.

If, in the opinion of the commissioner, the offer of any franchise exempt from registration under this chapter is being or has been offered for sale without complying with section 51-19-04 or subsection 2 of section 51-19-11, the commissioner may order the franchisor or offeror of the franchise to desist and refrain from the further offer or sale of the franchise unless and until an offer is made in compliance with this chapter. In addition to any other remedy authorized by this chapter, the commissioner may impose by order and collect a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation against any person found in an administrative action to have violated this chapter. The commissioner may bring an action in district court to recover penalties under this section. If, within fifteen days after the order has been served on the respondent, a request for a hearing is filed in writing by the person to whom the order was directed, a hearing must be held within fifteen business days after the date. If a request for hearing is not made within the fifteen days permitted herein, the order is final.

The commissioner may refer evidence available concerning any violation of this chapter or of any rule or order issued under this chapter to the appropriate criminal prosecutor who may, with or without the reference, institute criminal proceedings under this chapter. The criminal prosecutor may apply for and on due showing be issued the court’s subpoena requiring the appearance forthwith of any defendant and the defendant’s agents, employees, partners, officers, and directors, and the production of any documents, books, and records necessary for the prosecution of the criminal proceedings.

No action may be brought under this chapter by the commissioner after five years from the date that the commissioner knew or reasonably should have known about the facts that are the basis for the alleged violation. This subsection does not apply to any action under sections 51-19-09 and 51-19-11.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 452, § 13; 1991, ch. 97, § 8; 1995, ch. 100, §§ 16, 17; 2001, ch. 445, § 2.

51-19-14.
Criminal penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter or who willfully violates any rule or order under this chapter is guilty of a class B felony.

Any person who willfully employs, directly or indirectly, any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud in connection with the offer or sale of any franchise or willfully engages, directly or indirectly, in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person in connection with the offer, purchase, or sale of any franchise is guilty of a class B felony.

Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct that constitutes a crime.

An information must be filed or an indictment must be found under this chapter within five years after the commissioner or criminal prosecutor knew or reasonably should have known about the facts that are the basis for the prosecution.

“Willfully” means the person was aware of the consequences of the person’s actions, and proof of evil motive or intent to violate the law or knowledge that the law was being violated is not required. Each act or omission is a separate offense, and a prosecution or conviction for an offense does not bar a prosecution or conviction for any other offense.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 452, § 14; 1995, ch. 100, § 18.

51-19-15.
Service of process.

Every applicant for registration of an offer to sell franchises under this chapter, other than a domestic corporation or limited liability company, shall file with the commissioner in such form as the commissioner prescribes an irrevocable consent appointing the commissioner or commissioner’s successor in office to be the applicant’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against the applicant or applicant’s successor, executor, or administrator, which arises under this chapter or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent. A person who has filed such a consent in connection with a previous registration under this chapter need not file another. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the commissioner but it is not effective unless the plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at the defendant’s or respondent’s last address on file with the commissioner and the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this section is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

When any person, including any nonresident of this state, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, whether or not the person has filed a consent to service of process under subsection 1 and personal jurisdiction over the person cannot otherwise be obtained in this state, that conduct must be considered equivalent to the person’s appointment of the commissioner or commissioner’s successor in office to be the person’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against the person or the person’s successor, executor, or administrator which grows out of that conduct and which is brought under this chapter or any rule or order hereunder with the same force and validity as if served on the person personally. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the commissioner, but it is not effective until the plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at the defendant’s or respondent’s last-known address or takes other steps which are reasonably calculated to give actual notice and the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this section is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, and within such further time as the court allows.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 452, § 15; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

51-19-16.
General provisions.

Every franchisor or subfranchisor offering franchises for sale in this state shall at all times keep and maintain a complete set of books, records, and accounts of such sales, which must at all times be open to inspection by the commissioner, and shall make and file with the commissioner such reports as the commissioner may by rule or order prescribe.

The commissioner may accept and act upon the opinions, appraisals, and reports of any engineers, appraisers, or other experts which may be presented by an applicant or any interested party on any question of fact concerning or affecting the franchises proposed to be offered and sold. In lieu of, or in addition to, such opinions, appraisals, and reports, the commissioner may have any or all matters concerning or affecting such franchises investigated, appraised, passed upon, and certified to the commissioner by engineers, appraisers, or other experts selected by the commissioner.

Any document filed under this chapter may be incorporated by reference in a subsequent application filed under this chapter if it was filed within four years prior to the filing of such application or is otherwise available in the files of the commissioner, to the extent that the document is currently accurate.

In any proceeding under this chapter, the burden of proving an exemption or exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

The commissioner may honor requests from interested persons for interpretive opinions.

No provision of this chapter imposing any liability applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, form, order, or written interpretive opinion of the commissioner or any opinion of the attorney general, notwithstanding that the rule, form, order, or written interpretive opinion may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

Any condition, stipulation, or provision purporting to bind any person acquiring any franchise to waive compliance with any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder is void.

Every final order, decision, license, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 452, § 16.

51-19-17.
Administration.

This chapter must be administered by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall charge and collect the fees fixed by this section. All fees and charges collected under this section must be transmitted to the state treasurer and must be credited to the general fund.

The fee for filing an application for registration of the sale of franchises is two hundred fifty dollars.

The fee for filing an application for renewal of an application is one hundred dollars.

The fee for filing an amendment to the application is fifty dollars.

The fee for filing a notice of exemption is one hundred dollars.

The fee for filing for renewal of a notice of exemption is fifty dollars.

The expenses reasonably attributable to the investigation or examination of any matter arising under this chapter must be charged to the applicant or registrant involved, but the expenses so charged may not exceed such maximum amounts as the commissioner by rule prescribes.

The commissioner may from time to time make, amend, and rescind such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including rules and forms governing applications and reports and defining any terms, whether or not used in this chapter, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

All rules of the commissioner, other than those relating solely to the internal administration of the commissioner’s office, must be made, amended, or rescinded in accordance with chapter 28-32.

All applications, reports, and other papers and documents filed with the commissioner under this chapter must be open to public inspection, except that the commissioner may withhold from public inspection any information the disclosure of which is, in the judgment of the commissioner, not necessary in the public interest or for the protection of investors. The commissioner may publish any information filed with the commissioner or obtained by the commissioner, if, in the judgment of the commissioner, such action is in the public interest. No provision of this chapter authorizes the commissioner or any of the commissioner’s assistants, clerks, or deputies to disclose any information withheld from public inspection except among themselves or when necessary or appropriate in a proceeding or investigation under this chapter or to other federal or state regulatory agencies. No provision of this chapter either creates or derogates from any privilege which exists at common law or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under a subpoena directed to the commissioner or any of the commissioner’s assistants, clerks, or deputies.

It is unlawful for the commissioner or any of the commissioner’s assistants, clerks, or deputies to use for personal benefit any information which is filed with or obtained by the commissioner and which is not then generally available to the public.

A document is filed when it is received by the commissioner.

Upon request and at such reasonable charges as the commissioner prescribes by rule, the commissioner shall furnish to any person photostatic or other copies, certified under the commissioner’s seal of office if requested, of any document which is retained as a matter of public record except that the commissioner may not charge or collect any fee for photostatic or other copies of any document furnished to public officers for use in their official capacity. In any judicial proceeding or prosecution, any copy so certified is prima facie evidence of the contents of the document certified.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 452, § 17; 1989, ch. 592, § 2.

51-19-18.
Franchisor-franchisee liability protection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any voluntary agreement between the United States department of labor and a franchisee, a franchisee or an employee of a franchisee is not considered an employee of the franchisor.

History.

S.L. 2017, ch. 355, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.